Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.010

Definitions.

The words "mutual savings bank" and "savings bank," whenever used in this chapter, shall mean a mutual savings bank organized and existing under the laws of the state of Washington.

The words "its funds," whenever used in this chapter, shall mean and include moneys deposited with or borrowed by a mutual savings bank, sums credited to the guaranty fund of a mutual savings bank, and the income derived from such deposits or fund, or both, and the principal balance of any outstanding capital notes, and capital debentures.

[ 1999 c 14 s 24; 1977 ex.s. c 241 s 2; 1955 c 13 s 32.20.010. Prior: 1929 c 74 s 1; RRS s 3381-1.]